Utah statutes.
17B-1-1305.   Petition certification.

(1)  Within 30 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection 17B-1-1303(1)(a) or (2), the clerk shall:

(a)  with the assistance of officers of the county in which the local district is located from whom the clerk requests assistance, determine whether the petition meets the requirements of Section 17B-1-1303 and Subsection 17B-1-1304(1); and

(b) (i)  if the clerk determines that the petition complies with the requirements, certify the petition and mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact sponsor; or

(ii)  if the clerk determines that the petition fails to comply with any of the requirements, reject the petition and mail or deliver written notification of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection to the contact sponsor.

(2) (a)  If the clerk rejects a petition under Subsection (1)(b)(ii), the petition may be amended to correct the deficiencies for which it was rejected and then refiled.

(b)  A valid signature on a petition that was rejected under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) may be used toward fulfilling the applicable signature requirement of the petition as amended under Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  The clerk shall process an amended petition filed under Subsection (2)(a) in the same manner as an original petition under Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

